Washington statutes.
RCW 36.74.050

Rules and regulations, pending business, contracts, obligations, validity of official acts.

(1) All rules and regulations and all pending business before the board of any transportation benefit district transferred pursuant to this chapter must be continued and acted upon by the city or county.

(2) All existing contracts and obligations of the transferred transportation benefit district remain in full force and effect and must be performed by the city or county. A transfer authorized in this chapter does not affect the validity of any official act performed by any official or employee prior to the transfer authorized pursuant to this chapter.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 305.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 44: See note following RCW 46.68.395.